Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-316
Expenditure; inclusion in budget.

The amount to be expended for the ensuing year or biennial period shall be fixed at the time of making up the annual or biennial budget required by law, and the same shall be included in the budget.

Laws 1921, c. 187, § 2, p. 700;

C.S.1922, § 4393;

C.S.1929, § 18-1202;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-1402;

Laws 2000, LB 1116, § 5.